Utah statutes.
31A-27a-901.   Ancillary conservation of foreign insurers.
(1)  The commissioner may initiate an action against a foreign insurer
pursuant to Section 31A-27a-201 on any of the grounds stated in that section
or on the basis that:
(a)  any of the foreign insurer's property is sequestered, garnished, or
seized by official action in its domiciliary state or in any other state;
(b) (i)  the foreign insurer's certificate of authority to do business in this
state is revoked or a certificate of authority is never issued; and
(ii)  there is a resident of this state with an unpaid claim or in-force
policy; or
(c)  it is necessary to enforce a stay under Chapter 28, Guaranty
Associations.
(2)  If a domiciliary receiver is appointed, the commissioner may initiate an
action against a foreign insurer under this section only with the consent of
the domiciliary receiver.
(3) (a)  An order entered pursuant to this section shall appoint the
commissioner as conservator.
(b)  The conservator's title to assets shall be limited to the insurer's
property and records located in this state.
(4) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection 31A-27a-201(3), the conservator shall hold
and conserve the assets located in this state until:
(i)  the commissioner in the insurer's domiciliary state appoints its
receiver; or
(ii)  an order terminating conservation is entered under Subsection (7).
(b)  Once a domiciliary receiver is appointed, the conservator shall turn over
to the domiciliary receiver all property subject to an order under this
section.
(5)  The conservator may liquidate the property of the insurer that may be
necessary to cover the costs incurred in the initiation or administration of a
proceeding under this section.
(6) (a)  The court in which an action under this section is pending may issue
a finding of insolvency or an ancillary liquidation order.
(b)  An ancillary liquidation order shall be entered for the limited purposes
of:
(i)  liquidating assets in this state to pay costs under Subsection (5); or
(ii)  activating applicable guaranty associations in this state to pay valid
claims that are not being paid by the insurer.
(7)  The conservator may at any time petition the receivership court for an
order terminating an order entered under this section.
